Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6125XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 2307 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249.5A Ineligibility following 1 felony rental vandalism. 2 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 3 convicted of felony rental vandalism under section 716.10A 4 shall not be eligible to receive state supplementary assistance 5 pursuant to sections 249.3 through 249.5 until one of the 6 following conditions is satisfied: 7 a. Full restitution is paid to the landlord as ordered by 8 the sentencing court. 9 b. The person has served a term of incarceration imposed by 10 the court for the offense. 11 2. This section shall not apply to: 12 a. Assistance provided solely for dependent children who 13 were not involved in the violation of section 716.10A. 14 b. Emergency medical assistance required to preserve life 15 or prevent serious harm. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 716.10A Felony rental vandalism. 17 1. A tenant or occupant of a dwelling unit, as defined in 18 section 562A.6, who commits criminal mischief, as described 19 in section 716.1, that results in damage to the dwelling 20 unit exceeding one thousand dollars, or that involves the 21 intentional creation, introduction, or failure to prevent a 22 pest infestation that causes damage exceeding one thousand 23 dollars, is guilty of felony rental vandalism. 24 2. Felony rental vandalism is a class âDâ felony. 25 3. A clerk of the sentencing court shall notify the 26 department of health and human services of any conviction under 27 this section. 28 Sec. 3. FEDERAL HOUSING ASSISTANCE ââ LIMITATION. To the 29 extent permitted by federal law, a person convicted of felony 30 rental vandalism under section 716.10A, as enacted by this Act, 31 shall be ineligible for housing assistance under section 8 of 32 the United States Housing Act of 1937, Pub. L. No. 75-412, or 33 any successor program until the requirements of section 249.5A, 34 subsection 1, as enacted by this Act, are met. Nothing in this 35 -1- LSB 6125XS (3) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2307 section shall be construed to require action by the state that 1 would result in the loss of federal funding. 2